voikko-fi/vvfst/lukusanat.lexc
LEXICON RoomalainenNumero
[Lur][Xr]qq[X]ii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:ii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqq[X]iii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:iii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqq[X]iiii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:iiii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qq[X]iv[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:iv	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qq[X]vi[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:vi	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqq[X]vii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:vii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqq[X]viii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:viii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqqq[X]viiii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:viiii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qq[X]ix[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:ix	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]jj[X]ii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:ii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_a;
[Lur][Xr]jjj[X]iii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:iii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_a;
[Lur][Xr]jjjj[X]iiii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:iiii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jj[X]iv[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:iv	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jj[X]vi[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:vi	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_a;
[Lur][Xr]jjj[X]vii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:vii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jjjj[X]viii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:viii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_a;
[Lur][Xr]jjjjj[X]viiii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:viiii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jj[X]ix[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:ix	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]qq[X]xi[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xi	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqq[X]xii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqq[X]xiii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xiii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqqq[X]xiiii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xiiii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqq[X]xiv[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xiv	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qq[X]xv[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xv	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqq[X]xvi[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xvi	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqq[X]xvii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xvii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqqq[X]xviii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xviii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqqqq[X]xviiii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xviiii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqq[X]xix[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xix	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qq[X]xx[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xx	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]jj[X]xi[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xi	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jjj[X]xii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_a;
[Lur][Xr]jjjj[X]xiii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xiii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_a;
[Lur][Xr]jjjjj[X]xiiii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xiiii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jjj[X]xiv[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xiv	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jj[X]xv[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xv	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jjj[X]xvi[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xvi	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_a;
[Lur][Xr]jjjj[X]xvii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xvii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jjjjj[X]xviii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xviii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_a;
[Lur][Xr]jjjjjj[X]xviiii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xviiii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jjj[X]xix[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xix	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jj[X]xx[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xx	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_a;
[Lur][Xr]qqq[X]xxi[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxi	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqq[X]xxii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqqq[X]xxiii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxiii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqqqq[X]xxiiii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxiiii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqq[X]xxiv[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxiv	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqq[X]xxv[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxv	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqq[X]xxvi[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxvi	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqqq[X]xxvii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxvii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqqqq[X]xxviii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxviii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqqqqq[X]xxviiii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxviiii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqq[X]xxix[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxix	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqq[X]xxx[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxx	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]jjj[X]xxi[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxi	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jjjj[X]xxii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_a;
[Lur][Xr]jjjjj[X]xxiii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxiii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_a;
[Lur][Xr]jjjjjj[X]xxiiii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxiiii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jjjj[X]xxiv[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxiv	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jjj[X]xxv[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxv	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jjjj[X]xxvi[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxvi	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_a;
[Lur][Xr]jjjjj[X]xxvii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxvii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jjjjjj[X]xxviii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxviii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_a;
[Lur][Xr]jjjjjjj[X]xxviiii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxviiii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jjjj[X]xxix[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxix	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jjj[X]xxx[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxx	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_a;
[Lur][Xr]qqqq[X]xxxi[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxi	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqqq[X]xxxii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqqqq[X]xxxiii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxiii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqqqqq[X]xxxiiii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxiiii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqqq[X]xxxiv[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxiv	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqq[X]xxxv[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxv	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqqq[X]xxxvi[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxvi	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqqqq[X]xxxvii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxvii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqqqqq[X]xxxviii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxviii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqqqqqq[X]xxxviiii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxviiii	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqqq[X]xxxix[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxix	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qqqq[X]xxxx[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxx	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]qq[X]xl[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xl	Loppu;
[Lur][Xr]jjjj[X]xxxi[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxi	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jjjjj[X]xxxii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_a;
[Lur][Xr]jjjjjj[X]xxxiii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxiii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_a;
[Lur][Xr]jjjjjjj[X]xxxiiii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxiiii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jjjjj[X]xxxiv[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxiv	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jjjj[X]xxxv[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxv	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jjjjj[X]xxxvi[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxvi	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_a;
[Lur][Xr]jjjjjj[X]xxxvii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxvii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jjjjjjj[X]xxxviii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxviii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_a;
[Lur][Xr]jjjjjjjj[X]xxxviiii[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxviiii	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jjjjj[X]xxxix[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxix	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
[Lur][Xr]jjjj[X]xxxx[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xxxx	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_a;
[Lur][Xr]jj[X]xl[Xp][X][Sn][Ny]:xl	RoomalaisenNumeronJatko_ä;
